District of Columbia statutes.
29-307.06

Abandonment of a domestication.

(a)

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of domestication of a domestic business corporation, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by this subchapter, and at any time before the domestication has become effective, it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the shareholders.

(b)

If a domestication is abandoned under subsection (a) of this section after articles of charter surrender have been delivered to the Mayor for filing but before the domestication has become effective, a statement that the domestication has been abandoned in accordance with this section, signed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the Mayor for filing prior to the effective date of the domestication. The statement shall be effective upon filing and the domestication shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

(c)

If the domestication of a foreign business corporation in the District is abandoned in accordance with the laws of the foreign jurisdiction after articles of domestication have been delivered to the Mayor for filing, a statement that the domestication has been abandoned, signed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the Mayor for filing. The statement shall be effective upon filing and the domestication shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(22), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “delivered to the Mayor for filing” for “filed with the Mayor” in (b) and (c).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.